California statutes. Penal Code
(c) The written order of each county board shall be a sufficient warrant for all officers named therein to authorize them, or any of them, to return to actual custody any conditionally released or paroled prisoner. All chiefs of police, marshals of cities, sheriffs, and all other police and peace officers of this state shall execute any such order in like manner as ordinary criminal process.

(d) In computing the unserved sentence of a person returned to jail because of the revocation of his or her parole no credit shall be granted for the time between his or her release from jail on parole and his or her
 return to jail because of the revocation of his or her parole.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 456, Sec. 1.   (AB 884)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

3082.

Each county board may make and establish written rules and regulations for the unconditional release of and may unconditionally release any prisoner who is not a citizen or national of the United States and who voluntarily consents to return or to be returned to their native land and who actually returns or is returned. The necessary expenses of the transportation of the prisoner and officers or attendants in charge of the prisoner may be paid by the county, upon order of the board of supervisors authorizing or ratifying the return of the prisoner at the expense of the county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 296, Sec. 46.   (AB 1096)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

3083.

Whenever the board designates deputies to serve as temporary commissioners in considering applications for parole of prisoners, such temporary commissioners or deputies may also exercise all the powers granted by this article relative to the unconditional release of prisoners who are not citizens or nationals of the United States.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 296, Sec. 47.   (AB 1096)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

3084.

Each county board may release to the State Department of Corrections for return to a state prison or correctional institution any county or city jail inmate who is a state parole violator, when notified by the Board of Prison Terms.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 255.)
-------------------------------------------

3085.

The members of the board may for the purpose of considering applications for parole of prisoners from city or county jails, or industrial farms, or work furlough facilities, or industrial road camps, designate deputies of their respective offices to serve for them as temporary commissioners when they are unable to serve.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 3077 by Stats. 1978, Ch. 918.)
-------------------------------------------

3086.

Each county board shall not require, when setting terms or discharge dates, an admission of guilt to any crime for which an inmate was committed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 833.)
-------------------------------------------

3087.

No prisoner shall be paroled without supervision.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 117.)
-------------------------------------------

3088.

A prisoner who is released on parole pursuant to this article shall be supervised by a county parole officer of the county board of parole commissioners.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 229, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

3089.

(a) A county parole officer who is not a peace officer, as defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2, is a public officer who works at the direction of the County Board of Parole Commissioners, as provided for in Section 3075, and is responsible for supervising prisoners released on parole by the board. 

(b) A county parole officer who is a public officer, as defined in subdivision (a), shall have no right to carry or possess firearms in the performance of his or her prescribed duties. 

(c) A county parole officer, as defined in subdivision (a), shall comply with the standards for selection and training established by the Board of Corrections pursuant to Section 6035.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 229, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. Prison to Employment [3105. - 3105.]

3105.

The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall develop an Inmate Treatment and Prison-to-Employment Plan. The plan should evaluate and recommend changes to the Governor and the Legislature regarding current inmate education, treatment, and rehabilitation programs to determine whether the programs provide sufficient skills to inmates that will likely result in their successful employment in the community, and reduce their chances of returning to prison after release to parole. The department shall report the status of the development of the plan on or before October 1, 2007, again on or before January 15, 2008, and shall submit the final plan by April 1, 2008. The department may use resources of other state or local agencies, academic institutions, and other research organizations as necessary to develop the plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 7, Sec. 13.   Effective May 3, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



TITLE 2. IMPRISONMENT OF FEMALE PRISONERS IN STATE INSTITUTIONS [3200. - 3440.]



  CHAPTER 1. Establishment of Institution for Women [3200. - 3202.]

3200.

There is and shall continue to be within the State an institution for the punishment, treatment, supervision, custody and care of females convicted of felonies to be known as “The California Institution for Women.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 106.)
-------------------------------------------

3201.

The purpose of said institution shall be to provide custody, care, protection, industrial, vocational, and other training, and reformatory help, for women confined therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 106.)
-------------------------------------------

3202.

As used in the sections of this Part 3 of the Penal Code providing for penal offenses and punishments therefor, the term “State prison” or “prison” shall refer to and include the California Institution for Women.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 106.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Administration of Institution [3325. - 3326.]



  ARTICLE 1. Administration of Institution for Women [3325. - 3326.]

3325.

The warden described in this chapter shall, subject to the control of the director, have those powers, perform those duties and exercise those functions, respecting females convicted of felonies, as the wardens now exercise over male prisoners.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1420, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

3326.

The department is authorized to provide the necessary facilities, equipment, and personnel to operate a commissary at any institution under its jurisdiction for the sale of toilet articles, candy, gum, notions, and other sundries.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 798, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2005.   Operative July 1, 2005, by Sec. 9 of Ch. 798.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Prisoners [3400. - 3409.]

3400.

Upon the commitment or transfer of any woman to the institution it shall be the duty of the officer having custody of her or required to take custody of her, to deliver her to said institution, receiving therefor the fees payable for the transportation of prisoners to the state prisons. Such officer shall at the same time deliver to said institution a certified abstract of the judgment of conviction and of the order of commitment or order of transfer. Every woman so committed or transferred under this act shall be accompanied by a woman attendant from the place of commitment or transfer until delivered to said institution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 460.)
-------------------------------------------

3402.

There shall be kept at said institution a record of the history and progress of every woman confined therein during the period of her confinement, and so far as practically possible, prior and subsequent thereto, and all judges, courts, officials and employees, district attorneys, sheriffs, chiefs of police and peace officers, shall furnish said institution with all data in their possession or knowledge relative to any inmate that said institution may request. If upon the arrest of any woman it be discovered that she was theretofore an inmate of said institution, the institution shall be promptly notified of her arrest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 106.)
-------------------------------------------

3403.

Every woman upon being committed to said institution shall be examined mentally and physically, and shall be given the care, treatment and training adapted to her particular condition. Such care, treatment and training shall be along the lines best suited to develop her mentality, character and industrial capacity; provided, however, no inmate shall be confined longer than the term of her commitment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 106.)
-------------------------------------------

3404.

When there is any reasonable grounds to believe that a prisoner may be forcibly removed from the California Institution for Women, the warden shall report the fact to the Governor, who may order the removal of the prisoner to any California State prison for safekeeping, and it is hereby made the duty of the warden of the prison to accept and detain the prisoner for the further execution of her sentence. The Governor may thereafter order the prisoner returned to the California Institution for Women for the further execution of her sentence according to law.

The necessary costs and expenses incurred in carrying out the provisions of this section shall be a proper charge against any fund hereafter appropriated as an emergency fund, or similar appropriation for contingencies, notwithstanding any limitations or restrictions that may be imposed upon the expenditure of any appropriation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1420, Sec. 16.)
-------------------------------------------

3405.

(a) A condition or restriction shall not be imposed upon the obtaining of an abortion by an incarcerated person, pursuant to Sections 1 and 1.1 of Article I of the California Constitution and the Reproductive Privacy Act (Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 123460) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 106 of the Health and Safety Code), other than those contained in those provisions. Impermissible restrictions include, but are not limited to, imposing gestational limits inconsistent with state law, unreasonably delaying access to the procedure, or requiring court-ordered transport. Incarcerated persons found to be pregnant and desiring abortions, shall be permitted to determine their eligibility for an abortion pursuant to state and federal
 law, and if determined to be eligible, shall be permitted to obtain an abortion after giving informed consent.

(b) The rights provided by this section shall be posted in at least one conspicuous place to which all incarcerated persons capable of becoming pregnant have access.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 136, Sec. 22.   (AB 260)   Effective September 26, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

3406.

(a) Any incarcerated person shall have the right to summon and receive the services of any physician, nurse practitioner, certified nurse midwife, or physician assistant of their choice in order to determine whether they are pregnant. The warden may adopt reasonable rules and regulations with regard to the conduct of examinations to effectuate this determination.

(b) If the incarcerated person is found to be pregnant, they are entitled to a determination of the extent of the medical and surgical services needed and to the receipt of these services from the physician, nurse practitioner, certified nurse midwife, or physician assistant of their choice.
 Any expenses occasioned by the services of a physician, nurse practitioner, certified nurse midwife, or physician assistant whose services are not provided by the institution shall be borne by the incarcerated person.

(c) (1) A physician providing services pursuant to this section shall possess a current, valid, and unrevoked certificate to engage in the practice of medicine issued pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code.

(2) A nurse practitioner providing services pursuant to this section shall possess a current, valid, and unrevoked certificate issued pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 2834) of Chapter 6 of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code.

(3) A certified nurse midwife providing services pursuant to this section shall possess a current, valid, and unrevoked certificate issued pursuant to Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 2746) of Chapter 6 of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code.

(4) A physician assistant providing services pursuant to this section shall possess a current, valid, and unrevoked certificate issued pursuant to Chapter 7.7 (commencing with Section 3500) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code.

(d) The rights provided for incarcerated persons by this section
 shall be posted in at least one conspicuous place to which all incarcerated persons capable of becoming pregnant have access.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 321, Sec. 2.   (AB 732)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

3407.

(a) An inmate known to be pregnant or in recovery after delivery shall not be restrained by the use of leg irons, waist chains, or handcuffs behind the body.

(b) A pregnant inmate in labor, during delivery, or in recovery after delivery, shall not be restrained by the wrists, ankles, or both, unless deemed necessary for the safety and security of the inmate, the staff, or the public.

(c) Restraints shall be removed when a professional who is currently responsible for the medical care of a pregnant inmate during a medical emergency, labor, delivery, or recovery after delivery determines that the removal of restraints is medically necessary.

(d) This section shall not be interpreted to require restraints in a case where restraints are not required pursuant to a statute, regulation, or correctional facility policy.

(e) Upon confirmation of an inmate’s pregnancy, she shall be advised, orally or in writing, of the standards and policies governing pregnant inmates, including, but not limited to, the provisions of this chapter, the relevant regulations, and the correctional facility policies.

(f) For purposes of this section, “inmate” means an adult or juvenile who is incarcerated in a state or local correctional facility.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 726, Sec. 1.   (AB 2530)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

3408.

(a) A person incarcerated in the state prison who is identified as possibly pregnant or capable of becoming pregnant during an intake health examination or at any time during incarceration shall be offered a test upon intake or by request. Pregnancy tests shall be voluntary and not mandatory, and may only be administered by medical or nursing personnel. An incarcerated person who declines a pregnancy test shall be asked to sign an “Informed Refusal of Pregnancy Test” form that shall become part of their medical file.

(b) An incarcerated person with a positive pregnancy test result shall be offered comprehensive and unbiased options counseling that includes information about prenatal
 health care, adoption, and abortion. This counseling shall be furnished by a licensed health care provider or counselor who has been provided with training in reproductive health care and shall be nondirective, unbiased, and noncoercive. Prison staff shall not urge, force, or otherwise influence a pregnant person’s decision.

(c) A prison shall not confer authority or discretion to nonmedical prison staff to decide if a pregnant person is eligible for an abortion. If a pregnant person decides to have an abortion, that person shall be offered, but not forced to accept, all due medical care and accommodations until they are no longer pregnant. A pregnant person who decides to have an abortion shall be referred to a licensed professional specified in subdivision (b) of Section 2253 of the Business and Professions Code.

(d) A person incarcerated in prison who is confirmed to be pregnant shall, within seven days of arriving at the prison, be scheduled for a pregnancy examination with a physician, nurse practitioner, certified nurse-midwife, or physician assistant. The examination shall include all of the following:

(1) A determination of the gestational age of the pregnancy and the estimated due date.

(2) A plan of care, including referrals for specialty and other services to evaluate for the presence of chronic medical conditions or infectious diseases, and to use health and social status of the incarcerated person to improve quality of care, isolation practices, level of activities, and bed assignments, and to inform appropriate specialists
 in relationship to gestational age and social and clinical needs, and to guide use of personal protective equipment and additional counseling for prevention and control of infectious diseases, if needed.

(3) The ordering of prenatal labs and diagnostic studies, as needed based on gestational age or existing or newly diagnosed health conditions.

(e) Incarcerated pregnant persons shall be scheduled for prenatal care visits as follows, unless otherwise indicated by the physician, nurse practitioner, certified nurse-midwife, or physician assistant:

(1) Every four weeks in the first trimester up to 24 to 28 weeks.

(2) Every two weeks thereafter up to 36 weeks
 gestation.

(3) Every one week thereafter until birth.

(f) Incarcerated pregnant persons shall be provided access to all of the following:

(1) Prenatal vitamins, to be taken on a daily basis, in accordance with medical standards of care.

(2) Newborn care that includes access to appropriate assessment, diagnosis, care, and treatment for infectious diseases that may be transmitted from a birthing person to the birthing person’s infant, such as HIV or syphilis.

(3) A minimum of 120 ounces of free, clean bottled water each day.

(4) Daily
 high-quality and high caloric nutritional meals that meet guidelines established by the Department of Public Health for the California Special Supplemental Nutrition Program for Women, Infants, and Children established pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 123275) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 106 of the Health and Safety Code.

(g) Incarcerated pregnant persons housed in a multitier housing unit shall be assigned lower bunk and lower tier housing.

(h) (1) Incarcerated pregnant persons shall not be tased, pepper sprayed, or exposed to other chemical weapons.

(2) Incarcerated pregnant persons shall not be placed in solitary confinement or restricted housing units during their pregnancy, if
 known by the department to be pregnant, or for 12 weeks postpartum. This prohibition shall not apply when there is a credible and imminent threat to the safety or security of the incarcerated pregnant persons, though placement shall be regularly assessed and shall not be for more than five days. Individuals shall not be unenrolled from work assignments and rehabilitative programs when temporarily placed in restricted housing units.

(i) Incarcerated pregnant persons who have used opioids prior to incarceration, either by admission or written documentation by a probation officer, or who are currently receiving methadone treatment, shall be offered medication-assisted
 treatment with methadone or buprenorphine, pursuant to Section 11222 of the Health and Safety Code, and shall be provided information on the risks of withdrawal.

(j) (1) An eligible incarcerated pregnant person or person who gives birth after incarceration in the prison shall be provided notice of, access to, and written application for, community-based programs serving pregnant, birthing, or lactating incarcerated persons. At a minimum, the notice shall contain guidelines for qualification, the timeframe for application, and the process for appealing a denial of admittance to those programs.

(2) If a community-based program is denied access to the prison, the reason for the denial shall be provided in writing to the incarcerated person within five working
 days of receipt of the request. The written denial shall address the safety or security concerns for the incarcerated person, infant, public, or staff.

(k) Each incarcerated pregnant person shall be referred to a social worker who shall do all of the following:

(1) Discuss with the incarcerated person the options available for feeding, placement, and care of the child after birth, including the benefits of lactation.

(2) Assist the incarcerated pregnant person with access to a phone in order to contact relatives regarding newborn placement.

(3) Oversee the placement of the newborn child.

(l) An
 incarcerated pregnant person shall be temporarily taken to a hospital outside the prison for the purpose of giving childbirth and shall be transported in the least restrictive way possible and in accordance with Section 3407. An incarcerated pregnant person shall not be shackled to anyone else during transport. An incarcerated pregnant person in labor or presumed to be in labor shall be treated as an emergency and shall be transported to the outside facility, accompanied by prison staff.

(m) An incarcerated pregnant person may elect to have a support person present during labor, childbirth, and during postpartum recovery while hospitalized. The support person may be an approved visitor or the prison’s staff designated to assist with prenatal care, labor, childbirth, lactation, and postpartum care. The approval for the support person shall
 be made by the administrator of the prison or that person’s designee. If an incarcerated pregnant person’s request for an elected support person is denied, reason for the denial shall be provided in writing to the incarcerated person within five working days of receipt of the request. The written denial shall address the safety or security concerns for the incarcerated person, infant, public, or staff. Upon receipt of a written denial, the incarcerated pregnant person may choose the approved institution staff to act as the support person.

(n) All pregnant and postpartum incarcerated persons, including those who have a miscarriage, stillbirth, or abortion, including a termination of the pregnancy for medical reasons, shall receive appropriate, timely, culturally responsive, and medically accurate and comprehensive care, evaluation, and treatment of
 existing or newly diagnosed chronic conditions, including mental health disorders and infectious diseases.

(o) An incarcerated pregnant person in labor and delivery shall be given the maximum level of privacy possible during the labor and delivery process. If a guard is present, they shall be stationed outside the room rather than in the room, absent extraordinary circumstances. If a guard must be present in the room, the guard shall stand in a place that grants as much privacy as possible during labor and delivery. A guard shall be removed from the room if a professional who is currently responsible for the medical care of a pregnant incarcerated person during a medical emergency, labor, delivery, or recovery after delivery determines that the removal of the guard is medically necessary.

(p) Upon return to prison, the physician, nurse practitioner, certified nurse-midwife, or physician assistant shall provide a postpartum examination within one week from childbirth and as needed for up to 12 weeks postpartum, and shall determine whether the incarcerated person may be cleared for full duty or if medical restrictions are warranted. Postpartum individuals shall be given at least 12 weeks of recovery after any childbirth before they are required to resume normal activity.

(q) The rights provided for incarcerated persons by this section shall be posted in at least one conspicuous place to which all incarcerated persons have access.

(r) Prison staff shall not disclose identifying medical information related to an incarcerated person’s right to seek and
 obtain an abortion if the information is being requested based on either another state’s laws that interfere with a person’s rights under the Reproductive Privacy Act (Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 123460) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 106 of the Health and Safety Code) or a foreign penal civil action, as defined in Section 2029.200 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 722, Sec. 1.   (AB 2527)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

3408.4.

Within seven days of arriving at the prison, each incarcerated pregnant person shall be referred to a social worker who shall discuss with the incarcerated person options for parenting classes and other classes relevant to caring for newborns and options for visiting with the newborn. Upon referral, a social worker shall discuss with the incarcerated pregnant person the options to establish future placement for the child and to secure that placement for the child.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 738, Sec. 1.   (AB 2740)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

3408.5.

(a) A plan of care for an incarcerated pregnant person developed pursuant to Section 3408 shall include a meal plan with additional meals and beverages, in accordance with medical standards of care. 

(b) Following delivery at a medical facility as required by Section 3408, the incarcerated mother and the newborn child shall remain at the facility for as long as the medical provider determines is necessary after delivery for recovery and postpartum medical care. The incarcerated mother and child shall be provided with bonding time after delivery until discharge from the medical facility.

(c) The incarcerated mother shall be permitted to breastfeed the newborn while at the medical
 facility, and, while at the correctional facility, pump breast milk to be stored and provided to the child.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 738, Sec. 2.   (AB 2740)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

3409.

(a) A person incarcerated in state prison who menstruates or experiences uterine or vaginal bleeding shall, without needing to request, have ready access to, and be allowed to use, materials necessary for personal hygiene with regard to their menstrual cycle and reproductive system, including, but not limited to, sanitary pads and tampons, at no cost to the person. A person incarcerated in state prison who is capable of becoming pregnant shall, upon request, have access to, and be allowed to obtain, contraceptive counseling and their choice of birth control methods, subject to the provisions of subdivision (b), unless medically
 contraindicated.

(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), all birth control methods and emergency contraception approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration (FDA) shall be made available to incarcerated persons who are capable of becoming pregnant, with the exception of sterilizing procedures prohibited by Section 3440.

(2) The California Correctional Health Care Services shall establish a formulary that consists of all FDA-approved birth control methods and that shall be available to persons specified in subdivision (a). If a birth control method has more than one FDA-approved therapeutic equivalent, only one version of that method shall be required to be made available, unless another version is specifically indicated
 by a prescribing provider and approved by the chief medical physician at the facility. A person shall have access to nonprescription birth control methods without the requirement to see a licensed health care provider.

(c) (1) Any contraceptive service that requires a prescription, or any contraceptive counseling, provided to incarcerated persons who are capable of becoming pregnant, shall be furnished by a licensed health care provider who has been provided with training in reproductive health care, including contraceptive care and counseling, and shall be nondirective, unbiased, and noncoercive. These services shall be furnished by the facility or by any other agency that contracts with the facility. Except as provided in paragraph (2), health care providers furnishing contraceptive services shall receive training in the
 following areas:

(A) The requirements of this section.

(B) Providing nondirective, unbiased, and noncoercive contraceptive counseling and services.

(2) Providers who attend an orientation program for the Family Planning, Access, Care, and Treatment Program are deemed to have met the training requirements described in paragraph (1).

(d) Any incarcerated person who is capable of becoming pregnant shall be furnished by the facility with information and education regarding the availability of family planning services and their right to receive nondirective, unbiased, and noncoercive contraceptive counseling and services. Each facility shall post this information
 in conspicuous places to which all incarcerated persons who are capable of becoming pregnant have access.

(e) Contraceptive counseling and family planning services shall be offered and made available to all incarcerated persons who are capable of becoming pregnant at least 60 days, but not longer than 180 days, prior to a scheduled release date.

(f) This section does not limit an incarcerated person’s access to any method of contraception that is prescribed or recommended for any medically indicated reason.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 939, Sec. 1.   (AB 1810)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Community Treatment Programs [3410. - 3424.]

3410.

The term “community” shall, for the purposes of this chapter, mean an environment away from the prison setting which is in an urban or suburban area.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1054.)
-------------------------------------------

3411.

The Department of Corrections shall on or before January 1, 1980, establish and implement a community treatment program under which women inmates sentenced to state prison pursuant to Section 1168 or 1170 who have one or more children under the age of six years, whether born prior to or after January 1, 1976, shall be eligible to participate within the provisions of this section. The community treatment program shall provide for the release of the mother and child or children to a public or private facility in the community suitable to the needs of the mother and child or children, and which will provide the best possible care for the mother and child. In establishing and operating such program, the department shall have as a prime concern the establishment of a safe and wholesome environment for the participating children.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1044, Sec. 1.   Effective September 20, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

3412.

(a) The Department of Corrections shall provide pediatric care consistent with medical standards and, to the extent feasible, shall be guided by the need to provide the following:

(1) A stable, caregiving, stimulating environment for the children as developed and supervised by professional guidance in the area of child development.

(2) Programs geared to assure the stability of the parent-child relationship during and after participation in the program, to be developed and supervised by appropriate professional guidance. These programs shall, at a minimum, be geared to accomplish the following:

(A) The mother’s mental stability.

(B) The mother’s familiarity with good parenting and housekeeping skills.

(C) The mother’s ability to function in the community, upon parole or release, as a viable member.

(D) The securing of adequate housing arrangements after participation in the program.

(E) The securing of adequate child care arrangements after participation in the program.

(3) Utilization of the least restrictive alternative to incarceration and restraint possible to achieve the objectives of correction and of this chapter consistent with public safety and justice.

(b) (1) The Department of Corrections shall ensure that the children and mothers residing in a community treatment program have access to, and are permitted by the community treatment program to participate in, available local Head Start, Healthy Start, and programs for early childhood development pursuant to the California Children and Families Program (Division 108 (commencing with Section 130100) of the Health and Safety Code).

(2) The community treatment program shall provide each mother with written information about the available local programs, including the telephone numbers for enrolling a child in a program.

(3) The community treatment program shall also provide transportation to program services and otherwise assist and facilitate enrollment and participation for eligible children.

(4) Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed as granting or requiring preferential access or enrollment for children of incarcerated mothers to any of the programs specified in this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 297, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

3413.

(a) In determining how to implement this chapter, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall be guided by the need to utilize the most cost-efficient methods possible. Therefore, the Secretary of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation may enter into contracts
 with appropriate public or private agencies to provide housing, sustenance, services as provided in subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 3412, and supervision for incarcerated persons who are eligible for placement in community treatment programs. Incarcerated persons in the care of such agencies shall be subject to all provisions of law applicable to them.

(b) For the purposes of entering into or renewing agreements pursuant to this section, the department may enter into long-term contracts, not to exceed 10 years, for transfer of incarcerated persons to, or placement of incarcerated persons in, facilities under contract pursuant to this section.

(c) In awarding contracts pursuant to this section, the secretary shall advertise the potential contract and may entertain proposals for the establishment and operation of community treatment programs from public and private entities and shall give preference to the following community treatment programs:

(1) Programs with approved state or local land use.

(2) Programs that provide a rehabilitative, supportive setting and programming that is trauma informed, gender
 responsive, culturally responsive, and community oriented to improve the outcomes of the participants and reduce recidivism.

(3) Programs operated by a nonprofit organization that has demonstrated experience successfully operating a community correctional reentry center or community treatment program.

(4) Programs that have demonstrated expertise in supporting and strengthening family connection, particularly in parent-child relationships.

(d) Notwithstanding any other law, except as provided in subdivision (c), for the purposes of entering into or renewing agreements pursuant to this section, any process, regulation, or requirement, including any state government reviews or approvals, or third-party approval that is required under, or implemented pursuant to, any statute that relates to entering into or renewing
 those agreements, is hereby waived.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 111, Sec. 12.   (SB 157)   Effective September 17, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

3414.

The department shall establish reasonable rules and regulations concerning the operation of the program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1054.)
-------------------------------------------

3415.

(a) The probation department shall, no later than the day that any woman is sentenced to the state prison, notify such woman of the provisions of this chapter, if the term of the state imprisonment does not exceed six years on the basis of either the probable release or parole date computed as if the maximum amount of good time credit would be granted. The probation department shall determine such term of state imprisonment at such time for the purposes of this section.

(b) The woman may, upon the receipt of such notice and upon sentencing to a term in state prison, give notice of her desire to be admitted to a program under this chapter. The probation department or the defendant shall transmit such notice to the Department of Corrections, and to the appropriate local social services agency that conducts investigations for child neglect and dependency hearings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 42, Sec. 5.   Effective February 17, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

3416.

(a) If any woman received by or committed to the Department of Corrections has a child under six years of age, or gives birth to a child while an inmate under the jurisdiction of the Department of Corrections, the child and his or her mother shall, upon her request, be admitted to and retained in a community treatment program established by the Department of Corrections, subject to the provisions of this chapter.

(b) Women transferred to community treatment programs remain under the legal custody of the department and shall be subject at any time, pursuant to the rules and regulations of the Director of Corrections, to be detained in the county jail upon the exercise of a state parole or correctional officer’s peace officer powers as specified in Section 830.5, with the consent of the sheriff or corresponding official having jurisdiction over the facility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 961, Sec. 2.   Effective September 10, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

3417.

(a) Subject to reasonable rules and regulations adopted pursuant to Section 3414, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall admit to the program any applicant whose child was born prior to the receipt of the inmate by the department, whose child was born after the receipt of the inmate by the department, or who is pregnant, if all of the following requirements are met:

(1) The applicant has a probable release or parole date with a maximum time to be served of six years, calculated after deduction of any possible good time credit.

(2) The applicant was the primary caretaker of the infant prior to
 incarceration. “Primary caretaker” as used in this chapter means a parent who has consistently assumed responsibility for the housing, health, and safety of the child prior to incarceration. A parent who, in the best interests of the child, has arranged for temporary care for the child in the home of a relative or other responsible adult shall not for that reason be excluded from the category, “primary caretaker.”
